Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2601.01
Guardians
and conservators; training curricula.

The Public Guardian shall approve
training curricula for persons appointed as guardians and conservators. Such
training curricula shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) The rights of wards under sections 30-2601 to 30-2661 and the Public Guardianship Act specifically
and under the laws of the United States generally;

(2) The duties and responsibilities of guardians;

(3) Reporting requirements;

(4) Least restrictive options in the areas of housing, medical
care, and psychiatric care; and

(5) Resources to assist guardians in fulfilling their duties.

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB920, § 21.

Public Guardianship Act, see section 30-4101.